Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 44 Insurance Holding Company System Regulatory Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1 originally enacted this chapter as 39 of title 26. As a chapter 39 of title 26 already existed, chapter 39, as enacted by Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1, was renumbered as chapter 44.

§ 26-44-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Affiliate” or “affiliated” means a person that directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with a specified person;

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner as defined by W.S. 26-1-102(a)(viii);

“Control” means the power, direct or indirect, to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an official position or corporate office held by the person. Control shall be presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing ten percent (10%) or more of the voting securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted as provided by W.S.

26-44-104

that control does not exist in fact. The commissioner may determine, after furnishing all interested persons notice and opportunity to be heard and making specific findings of fact to support the determination, that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect;

“Insurance holding company system” means two (2) or more affiliated persons, one (1) or more of which is an insurer;

“Insurance subsidiary” means any subsidiary which transacts insurance as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xxx);

“Insurer” means as set forth in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xvi), (xix) and (xxviii) except that it does not include:

Agencies, authorities or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state; or

Fraternal benefit societies.

“Person” means as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xx);

“Security holder” means a person who owns any security of a specified person, including common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations and any other security convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire any of the foregoing;

“Subsidiary” means an affiliate controlled by a specified person directly or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries;

“Voting security” means any security convertible into or evidencing a right to acquire a voting security;

“Enterprise risk” means any activity, circumstance, event or series of events involving one (1) or more affiliates of an insurer that, if not remedied promptly, is likely to have a material adverse effect upon the financial condition or liquidity of the insurer or its insurance holding company system as a whole, including, but not limited to, anything that would cause the insurer’s risk-based capital to fall into company action level as set forth in W.S.

26-48-103

and

26-48-203

or would cause the insurer to be in hazardous financial condition pursuant to W.S.

26-3-116

;

“Group wide supervisor” means the regulatory official authorized to conduct and coordinate group wide supervision activities who is determined or acknowledged by the commissioner to have sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active insurance group under W.S.

26-44-119

;

“Internationally active insurance group” means an insurance holding company system that:

Includes an insurer registered under W.S.

26-44-104

; and

Meets all of the following criteria:

Writes premiums in at least three (3) countries;

The percentage of its gross premiums written outside of the United States is at least ten percent (10%) of its total gross written premiums;

Based on a three (3) year rolling average, its total assets are at least fifty billion dollars ($50,000,000,000.00) or its total gross written premiums are at least ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000.00).

“This act” means W.S.

26-44-101

through

26-44-119

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-101

; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xi); redesignated former (a)(xi) as (a)(xii); and substituted
“26-44-118” for “26-44-117”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), added "(xii)
"Group wide supervisor" means the regulatory official authorized to conduct and coordinate group wide supervision activities who is determined or acknowledged by the commissioner to have sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active insurance group under W.S.

26-44-119

;", "(xiii)
"Internationally active insurance group" means an insurance holding company system that:", "(A)
Includes an insurer registered under W.S.

26-44-104

; and", "(B)
Meets all of the following criteria:", "(I)
Writes premiums in at least three (3) countries;", "(II)
The percentage of its gross premiums written outside of the United States is at least ten percent (10%) of its total gross written premiums;" and "(III)
Based on a three (3) year rolling average, its total assets are at least fifty billion dollars ($50,000,000,000.00) or its total gross written premiums are at least ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000.00)."; substituted "(xiv)" for "(xii)" and "26-44-119" for "26-44-118".

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-44-102.
Subsidiaries of insurers.

Any domestic insurer, either by itself or in cooperation with one (1) or more persons, may organize or acquire one (1) or more subsidiaries provided the stock of the insurer’s subsidiaries are valued in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

26-6-302

. Subsidiaries may conduct any kind of business or businesses and their authority to do so shall not be limited by reason of the fact that they are subsidiaries of a domestic insurer.

In addition to investments in common stock, debt obligations and other securities permitted under all other sections of this chapter, a domestic insurer may also:

Invest in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations and other securities of one (1) or more subsidiaries, amounts which do not exceed the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the insurer’s assets or fifty percent (50%) of the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders, provided that after the investments, the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders will be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs. In calculating the amount of the investments, investments in domestic or foreign insurance subsidiaries and health maintenance organizations shall be excluded, and there shall be included:

Total net monies or other consideration expended and obligations assumed in the acquisition or formation of a subsidiary, including all organizational expenses and contributions to capital and surplus of the subsidiary whether or not represented by the purchase of capital stock or issuance of other securities; and

All amounts expended in acquiring additional common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations and other securities and all contributions to the capital or surplus, of a subsidiary subsequent to its acquisition or formation.

Invest any amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations and other securities of one (1) or more subsidiaries engaged or organized to engage exclusively in the ownership and management of assets authorized as investments for the insurer, provided that each subsidiary agrees to limit its investments in any asset so that the investments will not cause the amount of the total investment of the insurer to exceed any of the investment limitations specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection or in W.S.

26-7-102

through

26-7-116

applicable to the insurer. For the purposes of this paragraph, “the total investment of the insurer” shall include:

Any direct investment by the insurer in an asset; and

The insurer’s proportionate share of any investment in an asset by any subsidiary of the insurer, which shall be calculated by multiplying the amount of the subsidiary’s investment by the percentage of the ownership of the subsidiary.

With the approval of the commissioner, invest any greater amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations or other securities of one (1) or more subsidiaries, provided that after the investment the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders will be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs.

Whether any investment pursuant to subsection (b) of this section meets the applicable requirements is to be determined before the investment is made by calculating the applicable investment limitations as though the investment had already been made, taking into account the then outstanding principal balance on all previous investments in debt obligations and the value of all previous investments in equity securities as of the day they were made, net of any return of capital invested, not including dividends.

If an insurer ceases to control a subsidiary, it shall dispose of any investment in the subsidiary made pursuant to this section within three (3) years from the time of the cessation of control or within any further time the commissioner may prescribe, unless the investment meets the requirements for investment under any other section of this title and the insurer so notifies the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-102

; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “and health maintenance organizations” following “insurance subsidiaries” in (b)(i).

§ 26-44-103.
Acquisition of control of or merger with domestic insurer.

No person other than the issuer shall make a tender offer for or a request or invitation for tenders of, or agreement to exchange securities for or otherwise acquire, any voting security or any security convertible into a voting security of a domestic insurer or of any other person controlling a domestic insurer if, after consummation, the person would, directly or indirectly, be in control of the insurer and no person shall enter into an agreement to merge with or otherwise acquire control of a domestic insurer unless:

Thirty (30) days prior to the above transactions the person has filed with the commissioner and has sent to the insurer a statement containing the information required by this section;

The offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition has been approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this section a domestic insurer includes any person controlling a domestic insurer unless the person, as determined by the commissioner, is either directly or through its affiliates primarily engaged in business other than the business of insurance. For the purposes of this section, “person” does not include any securities broker holding, in the usual and customary broker’s function, less than twenty percent (20%) of the voting securities of an insurance company or of any person which controls an insurance company; and

If any controlling person of a domestic insurer is seeking to divest its controlling interest in the domestic insurer in any manner, the controlling person has filed with the commissioner, with a copy to the insurer, confidential notice of its proposed divestiture at least thirty (30) days prior to the cessation of control. The commissioner shall determine those instances in which the party seeking to divest or to acquire a controlling interest in an insurer will be required to file for and obtain approval of the transaction. The information shall remain confidential until the conclusion of the transaction unless the commissioner, in his discretion determines that confidential treatment will interfere with enforcement of this section. If the statement referred to in paragraph (i) of this subsection is otherwise filed by the acquiring person or as otherwise required, this paragraph shall not apply.

The preacquisition statement required by subsection (a) of this section shall be made under oath or affirmation and shall contain the following:

The name and address of each person by whom or on whose behalf the merger or other acquisition of control referred to in subsection (a) of this section is to be made and the following:

If the person is an individual, his principal occupation and all offices and positions held during the past five (5) years, and any conviction of crimes other than minor traffic violations during the past ten (10) years;

If the person is not an individual, a report of the nature of its business operations during the past five (5) years or for such lesser period as the person and any predecessors of the person have been in existence, an informative description of the business intended to be done by the person and the person’s subsidiaries, and a list of all individuals who are or who have been selected to become directors or executive officers of the person, or who perform or will perform functions appropriate to these positions. The list shall include for each individual the information required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

The source, nature and amount of the consideration used or to be used in effecting the merger or other acquisition of control, a description of any transaction where funds were or are to be obtained for that purpose including any pledge of the insurer’s stock or the stock of any of its subsidiaries or controlling affiliates, and the identity of persons furnishing the funds where a source of the funds is a loan made in the lender’s ordinary course of business, the identity of the lender shall remain confidential if the person filing the statement so requests;

Fully audited financial information as to the earnings and financial condition of each acquiring party for the preceding five (5) fiscal years or for any lesser period the acquiring party and any of its predecessors have been in existence, and similar unaudited information as of a date not earlier than ninety (90) days before the filing of the statement;

Any plans or proposals which each acquiring party may have to liquidate the insurer, to sell its assets or merge or consolidate it with any person, or to make any other material change in its business or corporate structure or management;

The number of shares of any security referred to in subsection (a) of this section which each acquiring party proposes to acquire, and the terms of the offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition referred to in subsection (a) of this section, and a statement as to the method by which the fairness of the proposal was determined;

The amount of each class of any security referred to in subsection (a) which is beneficially owned or concerning which there is a right to acquire beneficial ownership by each acquiring party;

A full description of any contracts, arrangements or understandings with respect to any security referred to in subsection (a) of this section in which any acquiring party is involved, including but not limited to transfer of any of the securities, joint ventures, loan or option arrangements, puts or calls, guarantees of loans, guarantees against loss or guarantees of profits, division of losses or profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies. The description shall identify the persons with whom the contracts, arrangements or understandings have been entered;

A description of the purchase of any security referred to in subsection (a) of this section during the twelve (12) calendar months preceding the filing of the statement, by any acquiring party, including the dates of purchase, names of the purchasers and consideration paid or agreed to be paid;

A description of any recommendations to purchase any security referred to in subsection (a) of this section made during the twelve (12) calendar months preceding the filing of the statement by any acquiring party or by anyone based upon interviews or at the suggestion of the acquiring party;

Copies of all tender offers for, requests, or invitations for tenders of, exchange offers for, and agreements to acquire or exchange any securities referred to in subsection (a) of this section, and of additional related soliciting material;

The term of any agreement, contract or understanding made with or proposed to be made with any broker-dealer as to solicitation of securities referred to in subsection (a) of this section for tender, and the amount of any fees, commissions or other compensation to be paid to broker-dealers;

An agreement by the person required to file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section that it will provide the annual report, specified in W.S. 26-44-104(n), for so long as control exists;

An acknowledgement by the person required to file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section that the person and all subsidiaries within its control in the insurance holding company system will provide information to the commissioner upon request as necessary to evaluate enterprise risk to the insurer; and

Any additional information as the commissioner may by rule or regulation prescribe as necessary or appropriate for the protection of policyholders of the insurer or in the public interest.

If the person required to file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section is a partnership, limited partnership, syndicate or other group, the commissioner may require that the information called for by subsection (b) of this section shall be given with respect to each partner of the partnership or limited partnership, each member of the syndicate or group, and each person who controls the partner or member. If any partner, member or person is a corporation, or the person required to file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section is a corporation, the commissioner may require that the information called for by subsection (b) of this section shall be given with respect to the corporation, each officer and director of the corporation, and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than ten percent (10%) of the outstanding voting securities of the corporation.

If any material change occurs in the facts set forth in the statement filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer pursuant to this section, an amendment setting forth the change, together with copies of all documents and other material relevant to the change, shall be filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer within two (2) business days after the person learns of the change.

If any offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition referred to in subsection (a) of this section is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or under a state law requiring similar registration or disclosure, the person required to file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section may utilize documents prepared for those laws in furnishing the information called for by this section.

The commissioner shall approve any merger or other acquisition of control referred to in subsection (a) of this section unless after a public hearing he finds that:

After the change of control, the domestic insurer referred to in subsection (a) of this section would not be able to satisfy the requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines of insurance for which it is presently licensed;

The effect of the merger or other acquisition of control would substantially lessen competition in insurance in Wyoming or tend to create a monopoly in Wyoming. The commissioner may condition the approval of the merger or other acquisition on the removal of the basis of disapproval within a specified period of time;

The financial condition of any acquiring party might jeopardize the financial stability of the insurer, or prejudice the interest of its policyholders;

The plans or proposals which the acquiring party has to liquidate the insurer, sell its assets or consolidate or merge it with any person, or to make any other material change in its business or corporate structure or management, are unfair and unreasonable to policyholders of the insurer and not in the public interest;

The competence, experience and integrity of those persons who would control the operation of the insurer are such that it would not be in the interest of policyholders of the insurer and of the public to permit the merger or other acquisition of control; or

The acquisition is likely to be hazardous or prejudicial to the insurance buying public.

The public hearing referred to in subsection (f) of this section shall be held within thirty (30) days after the statement required by subsection (a) of this section is filed, and at least twenty (20) days notice of the hearing shall be given by the commissioner to the person filing the statement. Not less than seven (7) days notice of the public hearing shall be given by the person filing the statement to the insurer and to any other persons designated by the commissioner. The commissioner shall make a determination within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of the hearing. At the hearing, the person filing the statement, the insurer, any person to whom notice of hearing was sent, and any other person whose interest may be affected shall have the right to present evidence, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and offer oral and written arguments and shall be entitled to conduct discovery proceedings in the same manner as is presently allowed in district court. All discovery proceedings shall be concluded not later than three (3) days prior to the commencement of the public hearing.

If the proposed acquisition of control will require the approval of more than one (1) commissioner, the public hearing referred to in subsection (g) of this section may be held on a consolidated basis upon request of the person filing the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section. The person shall file the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners within five (5) days of making the request for a public hearing. A commissioner may opt out of a consolidated hearing, and shall provide notice to the applicant of the opt-out within ten (10) days of the receipt of the statement referred to in subsection (a) of this section. A hearing conducted on a consolidated basis shall be public and shall be held within the United States before the commissioners of the states in which the insurers are domiciled. The commissioners shall hear and receive evidence. A commissioner may attend the hearing in person or by telecommunication.

In connection with a change of control of a domestic insurer, any determination by the commissioner that the person acquiring control of the insurer shall be required to maintain or restore the capital of the insurer to the level required by the laws and regulations of this state shall be made not later than sixty (60) days after the date of notification of the change in control submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The commissioner may retain at the acquiring person’s expense any attorneys, actuaries, accountants and other experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner’s staff reasonably necessary to assist the commissioner in reviewing the proposed acquisition of control.

The provisions of this section do not apply to:

Any transaction which is subject to the provisions of W.S.

26-24-146

through

26-24-149

;

Any offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition which the commissioner by order shall exempt as not having been made or entered into for the purpose and not having the effect of changing or influencing the control of a domestic insurer.

The following shall be violations of this section:

The failure to file any statement, amendment or other material required to be filed pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section; or

The effectuation or any attempt to effectuate an acquisition of control of, divestiture of, or merger with, a domestic insurer unless the commissioner has given approval.

The Wyoming courts have jurisdiction over every person who files a statement with the commissioner under this section, and overall actions arising out of violations of this section. Any person filing a statement with the commissioner appoints the commissioner as his agent for service of process for actions arising under this section. The commissioner shall send copies of all legal services by certified mail to the appropriate person at his last known address.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-103

; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “and” following “this section;” in (a)(i); substituted a “; and” for the “period (.)” at the end of (a)(ii); added (a)(iii); deleted “information” following “contain the following” in (b); added (b)(xii) and (b)(xiii); redesignated former (b)(xii) as (b)(xiv); added (h) and (j); redesignated former (h) as (k); redesignated former (j) as (m); added (n); redesignated former (k) as (o).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Securities Act of 1993. —

The Security Act of 1933 is codified as 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.

Securities Exchange Act of 1934. —

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 is codified as 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

§ 26-44-104.
Registration of insurers.

Every insurer which is authorized to do business in this state and which is a member of an insurance holding company system shall register with the commissioner, except a foreign insurer subject to registration requirements and standards adopted by statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of its domicile which are substantially similar to those contained in this section, W.S. 26-44-105(a),

26-44-106

and

26-44-108

and a provision which substantially requires each registered insurer to keep current the information required to be disclosed in its registration statement by reporting all material changes or additions within fifteen (15) days after the end of the month in which it learns of each such change or addition.

Any insurer which is subject to registration under this section shall register within fifteen (15) days after it becomes subject to registration, and annually thereafter by July 1 of each year for the previous calendar year, unless the commissioner for good cause shown extends the time for registration, and then within the extended time. The commissioner may require any insurer authorized to do business in the state which is a member of an insurance holding company system, and which is not subject to registration under this section, to furnish a copy of the registration statement, the summary specified in W.S. 26-44-104(d) or other information filed by the insurance company with the insurance regulatory authority of the domiciliary jurisdiction.

Every insurer subject to registration shall file the registration statement containing any information required by regulation by the commissioner and in the form prescribed by regulation by the commissioner, which shall contain the following current information:

The capital structure, general financial condition, ownership and management of the insurer and any person controlling the insurer;

The identity and relationship of every member of the insurance holding company system;

The following agreements in force, and transactions currently outstanding or which have occurred during the last calendar year between the insurer and its affiliates:

Loans, other investments, or purchases, sales or exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the insurer by its affiliates;

Purchases, sales or exchange of assets;

Transactions not in the ordinary course of business;

Guarantees or undertakings for the benefit of an affiliate which result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer’s assets to liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the ordinary course of the insurer’s business;

All management agreements, service contracts and all cost-sharing arrangements;

Reinsurance agreements;

Dividends and other distributions to shareholders; and

Consolidated tax allocation agreements.

Any pledge of the insurer’s stock, including stock of any subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to any member of the insurance holding company system;

If requested by the commissioner, the insurer shall include financial statements of or within an insurance holding company system, including all affiliates. Financial statements may include but are not limited to annual audited financial statements filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. An insurer required to file financial statements pursuant to this paragraph may satisfy the request by providing the commissioner with the most recently filed parent corporation financial statements that have been filed with the SEC;

Other matters concerning transactions between registered insurers and any affiliates as may be included from time to time in any registration forms adopted or approved by the commissioner;

Statements that the insurer’s board of directors oversees corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer’s officers or senior management have approved, implemented, and continue to maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal control procedures;

Any other information required by the commissioner by rule or regulation.

All registration statements shall contain a summary outlining all items in the current registration statement representing changes from the prior registration statement.

Information need not be disclosed on the registration statement filed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section if the information is not material for the purposes of this section. Unless the commissioner by rule, regulation or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, investments or guarantees involving one-half of one percent (.5%) or less of an insurer’s admitted assets as of December 31, of the year immediately preceding are not material for purposes of this section.

Each registered insurer shall report to the commissioner all dividends and other distributions to shareholders within fifteen (15) business days following the declaration of the dividend or distribution.

Any person within an insurance holding company system subject to registration is required to provide complete and accurate information to an insurer where the information is reasonably necessary to enable the insurer to comply with the provisions of this act.

The commissioner shall terminate the registration of any insurer which demonstrates that it no longer is a member of an insurance holding company system.

The commissioner may require or allow two (2) or more affiliated insurers subject to registration under this act to file a consolidated registration statement.

The commissioner may allow an insurer which is authorized to do business in this state and which is part of an insurance holding company system to register on behalf of any affiliated insurer which is required to register under subsection (a) of this section and to file all information and material required to be filed under this section.

Any person may file with the commissioner a disclaimer of affiliation with any authorized insurer or the disclaimer may be filed by the insurer or any member of an insurance holding company system. The disclaimer shall fully disclose all material relationships and bases for affiliation between the person and the insurer as well as the basis for disclaiming the affiliation. A disclaimer of affiliation shall be deemed to have been approved unless the commissioner, within thirty (30) days following receipt of a complete disclaimer, notifies the filing party the disclaimer is disallowed. In the event of disallowance, the disclaiming party may request an administrative hearing, which shall be granted. The disclaiming party shall be relieved of its duty to register under this section if approval of the disclaimer has been granted by the commissioner, or if the disclaimer is deemed to have been approved.

Beginning July 1, 2014, the ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk report. The report shall, to the best of the ultimate controlling person’s knowledge and belief, identify the material risks within the insurance holding company system that could pose enterprise risk to the insurer. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

The failure to file a registration statement or any summary of the registration statement or enterprise risk filing required by this section within the time specified for filing shall be a violation of this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-104

; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “26-44-105(a)” for “24-44-105(a)(i),
26-44-105(a)(ii)” in (a); deleted “a” and added “an insurance” preceding “holding company system,” in (b); substituted “, which shall contain the following current information:” for “. The regulation may by reference require the information required by the National Association of Insurance Commissioner.” in (c); added (c)(i) through (c)(viii); substituted “A disclaimer of affiliation shall be deemed to have been approved unless the commissioner, within thirty (30) days following receipt of a complete disclaimer, notifies the filing party the disclaimer is disallowed.
In the event of disallowance, the disclaiming party may request an administrative hearing, which shall be granted.
The disclaiming party shall be relieved of its duty to register under this section if approval of the disclaimer has been granted by the commissioner, or if the disclaimer is deemed to have been approved.” for “After a disclaimer has been filed, the insurer shall be relieved of any duty to register or report under this section which may arise out of the insurer's relationship with the person unless and until the commissioner disallows the disclaimer.
The commissioner shall disallow a disclaimer only after furnishing all parties in interest with notice and an opportunity to be heard and after making specific findings of fact to support the disallowance.” in (m); and added (n) and (o).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Securities Act of 1993. —

The Security Act of 1933 is codified as 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.

Securities Exchange Act of 1934. —

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934 is codified as 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.